Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3552.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 86B.30, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Adult operator. "Adult operator" means a motorboat operator, including a personal watercraft operator, who is 12 years of age or older and who wasdeleted text begin :deleted text end deleted text begin (1) effective July 1, 2025,deleted text end born on or after July 1, 2004deleted text begin ;deleted text end deleted text begin (2) effective July 1, 2026, born on or after July 1, 2000; deleted text end deleted text begin (3) effective July 1, 2027, born on or after July 1, 1996; and deleted text end deleted text begin (4) effective July 1, 2028, born on or after July 1, 1987deleted text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end